Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1944
Member's liability for dues, assessments, and fees.

A member may become liable to the corporation for dues, assessments, or fees. However, an article or bylaw provision or a resolution adopted by the board authorizing or imposing dues, assessments, or fees does not, of itself, create liability.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 44.